Utah statutes.
62A-5-104.   Director -- Qualifications -- Responsibilities.
(1)  The director of the division shall be appointed by the executive
director.
(2)  The director shall have a bachelor's degree from an accredited university
or college, be experienced in administration, and be knowledgeable in
developmental disabilities, mental retardation, and other disabilities.
(3)  The director is the administrative head of the division.
(4)  The director shall appoint the superintendent of the developmental center
and the necessary and appropriate administrators for other facilities operated
by the division with the concurrence of the executive director.
